California, session 20252026, AB1749.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1714.57 is added to the Civil Code, to read:1714.57. (a) A person shall not operate or use an unmanned aerial vehicle, remote-piloted aircraft, or drone to knowingly or recklessly interfere with a either of the following:(1) A wildfire suppression, or law enforcement or emergency response efforts related to a wildfire suppression.(2) An emergency response related to an incident for which a temporary flight restriction has been issued by the Federal Aviation Administration.(b) The Attorney General or a county counsel or city attorney may bring a civil action to enforce subdivision (a). The prevailing plaintiff in an action may recover any of the following in any court of competent jurisdiction:(1) A civil penalty not exceeding seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) for each violation.(2) Injunctive relief.(3) Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.